District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.14

Exemption for total expenses under $500.

Except for the provisions of § 1-1163.12(a), the provisions of this part shall not apply to any candidate who anticipates spending or spends less than $500 in any one election and who has not designated a principal campaign committee. On the 15th day before the date of the election in which the candidate is entered, and on the 30th day after the date of the election, the candidate shall certify to the Director of Campaign Finance that he or she has not spent more than $500 in the election.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 314, 59 DCR 1862